Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-739
Transfer
of servicing rights; duties.

Not less than fifteen days prior
to the effective date of the transfer of servicing rights involving any residential mortgage loan,
the licensee transferring the servicing rights shall send a written notice
of transfer to each borrower which shall include:

(1) The effective date of the transfer;

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the transferee and the
name of a referral person or department of the transferee;

(3) Instructions concerning payments made before the effective date
of the transfer; and

(4) Instructions concerning payments made after the effective date of
the transfer.

The provisions of this section shall not apply when the licensee transferring
the servicing rights has provided the borrower with a written notice of transfer
at the time of closing on the residential mortgage
loan.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 45-713;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 24.